District of Columbia statutes.
50-2609

Repealed

Acquisition of new parking facilities prohibited; operation and expansion of existing facilities; exempt facilities.

Repealed.

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 10
as added Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 19, Pub. L. 87-408, § 603
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-108, § 3(a), (d), 27 DCR 3781
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(g), 53 DCR 6499
1981 Ed., § 40-811.
1973 Ed., § 40-809a.